Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.700

Purpose of diploma—Elements of obtainment.

(1) The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 28A.230.320, graduation from a public high school and the earning of a high school diploma must include the following:

(a) Satisfying the graduation requirements established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090 and any graduation requirements established by the applicable public high school or school district;

(b) Satisfying credit and subject area requirements for graduation;

(c) Demonstrating career and college readiness through completion of the high school and beyond plan required by RCW 28A.230.212; and

(d) Meeting the requirements of at least one graduation pathway option required by RCW 28A.230.710.

(3) Successful completion of the requirements in subsection (2) of this section signals a student's readiness to graduate with a meaningful high school diploma that fulfills the purpose of a diploma as established by this section.

[ 2024 c 66 s 1.]